Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2754
Department of Banking and Finance; Department of Revenue; provide data and share information.

The Department of Banking and Finance shall, as requested, provide to the Department of Revenue the data of money transmitters as necessary to meet the responsibilities of the Department of Revenue under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, to the extent the Department of Banking and Finance collects such information. The Department of Revenue may, as requested by the director, share information with the Department of Banking and Finance as necessary to enforce the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.

Laws 2026, LB838, § 9.
July 1, 2026